Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5350.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-56-38.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-56 entitled
"Corrections Department" is hereby repealed.
42-56-38.1. Prisoner telephone use.
(a) When an inmate requests and receives a list of parties approved to receive telephone
calls, the inmate shall be provided the option of using either a debit or collect call system to place
such calls. Under the debit system, either the cost of such service shall be automatically deducted
from the account maintained by the inmate for that purpose, or the inmate shall set aside money
from his/her account to be placed in a prepaid telephone account.
(b) No telephone service provider shall charge a customer rate for calls made from a prison
in excess of rates charged for comparable calls made in non-prison settings. All rates shall reflect
the lowest reasonable cost to inmates and call recipients.
(c) No concessions agreements for inmate telephone calling services shall include
provisions for a commission payable to the state, nor shall any correctional institution impose a
surcharge for telephone usage by inmates in addition to the charges imposed by the telephone
service provider.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-56 of the General Laws entitled "Corrections Department" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-56-38.3. Prisoner telephone use -- Communication with people confined to
correctional facilities.

(a) When an inmate requests and receives a list of parties approved to receive telephone
calls, the department of corrections of any agency charged with the operation and management of
state prisons, local jail cells maintained by any local or state law enforcement agency and youth
residential placements or detention centers shall provide persons in their custody and confined in a
correctional or detention facility, or held by any law enforcement agency pending an initial court
appearance, with voice communication service. The department of corrections or other agency may
supplement voice communication service with other communication services, including, but not
limited to, video communication and electronic mail or messaging services. To the extent that such
voice communication service or any other communication service is provided, which shall not be
limited beyond program participation and routine facility procedures, each such service shall be
provided free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication.
(b) The department of corrections, including all adult and juvenile facilities, in order to
facilitate and accomplish the purposes of this section, shall maintain at a minimum the greater of:
(1) A ten (10) to one ratio of persons in custody to operable voice communication
devices/telephones in each housing unit; or
(2) At least two (2) voice communication devices/telephones in each housing unit.
(c) Neither the department of corrections nor any agency charged with the operation and
management of state prisons, or local jail cells maintained by any local or state law enforcement
agency or youth residential placements or detention centers, shall receive revenue from the
provision of voice communication services or any other communication services to any person
confined in any correctional facility, local jail cell or youth residential placement or detention
center.
(d) The department of corrections or any agency charged with the operation and
management of state prisons or youth residential placements or detention centers shall provide
persons in their custody and confined in their facilities with in-person contact visits.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001059
========
LC001059 - Page 2 of 3